nl: Sleutelsysteem fluit: Böhm; Kingma-systeem; Simpel systeem; Overige
da: Fløjtenøglesystem: Böhm; Kingma-system; Simpelt system; Andet
tr: Flüt tuş sistemi: Boehm; Kingma sistemi; Basit sistem; Diğer
bg-BG: Клавишна система на флейтата: Система Бьом; Система Кингма; Опростена система; Друга
hu: Fuvola billentyűrendszere: Böhm-rendszerű; Kingma-rendszerű; Egyszerű rendszerű; Egyéb
pt-BR: Sistema de chaves da flauta: Boehm; Sistema Kingma; Sistema simples; Outro
nb: Knappesystem for fløyte: Boehm; Kingma-system; Enkelt system; Annet
pt-PT: Sistema de chaves da flauta: Boehm; Sistema Kingma; Sistema simples; Outro
it: Sistema di chiavi del flauto: Boehm; Sistema Kingma; Sistema semplice; Altro
es: Sistema de llaves de la flauta: Boehm; Sistema Kingma; Sistema simple; Otro
th: ระบบคีย์ของฟลุต: โบห์ม; ระบบคิงมา; ระบบธรรมดา; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Sistem de clape pentru flaut: Sistem Boehm; Sistem Kingma; Sistem simplu; Altele
zh-TW: 長笛按鍵系統: 波姆系統 (Boehm); Kingma 系統; 簡單系統; 其他
pl: System klawiszy fletu: System Boehma; System Kingma; System prosty; Inny
ko: 플루트 키 시스템: 벰 시스템; 킹마 시스템; 심플 시스템; 기타
en: Flute key system: Boehm; Kingma system; Simple system; Other
lt-LT: Fleitos klavišų sistema: Bemo sistema; Kingmos sistema; Paprastoji sistema; Kita
sv: Tvärflöjt – klaffsystem: Böhm; Kingma-system; Enkelt system; Övrigt
ja: フルートキーシステム: ベーム式; キングマシステム; シンプルシステム; その他
cs: Systém klapek na flétně: Boehmův systém; Kingmův systém; Jednoduchý systém; Ostatní
fr: Système de clés de la flûte: Boehm; Système Kingma; Système simple; Autre
zh-CN: 长笛按键系统: 波姆体系 (Boehm); 金玛体系 (Kingma system); 简单体系; 其他
vi: Hệ thống phím của sáo Tây: Hệ thống Boehm; Hệ thống Kingma; Hệ thống đơn giản; Khác
sl-SI: Sistem zaklopk flavte: Sistem Boehm; Sistem Kingma; Preprosti sistem; Drugo
fi: Huilun kosketinjärjestelmä: Boehm; Kingma-järjestelmä; Yksinkertainen järjestelmä; Muu
sk-SK: Systém klapiek na flaute: Boehmov systém; Kingmov systém; Jednoduchý systém; Iné
ru: Система клапанов флейты: Система Бёма; Система Кингма; Простая система; Другое
hr-HR: Sustav tipki flaute: Boehmov sustav; Sustav Kingma; Jednostavni sustav; Ostalo
el: Σύστημα κλειδιών φλάουτου: Σύστημα Boehm; Σύστημα Kingma; Απλό σύστημα; Άλλο
de: Klappensystem der Flöte: Böhm-System; Kingma-System; Einfaches System; Sonstiges